en: E1101(ii)
xx: E1101(ii)

en: E1101(iii)
xx: E1101(iii)

en: E1101(iv)
xx: E1101(iv)

en: E1101(v), Protease from Streptomyces fradiae
xx: E1101(v)

en: E1101(vi), Proteases from Bacillus subtilis
xx: E1101(vi)

en: E1102, Glucose oxidase
xx: E1102
bg: E1102, Глюкозна оксидаза
cs: E1102, Glukóza oxidáza
da: E1102, Glukoseoxidase
de: E1102, Glukose-Oxidase, Glucose-Oxidase, Glukoseoxidase
el: E1102, Γλυκόζη οξειδάση
es: E1102, Glucosa oxidasa
et: E1102, Glükoosoksüdaas
fi: E1102, Glukoosioksidaasi, Glukoosioksidaasia
fr: E1102, Glucose oxydase
hu: E1102, Glükóz-oxidáz
it: E1102, Glucosio ossidasi
lt: E1102, Glukozės oksidazė
lv: E1102, Glikozes oksidāze
mt: E1102, Ossidasi tal-Glukożi
nl: E1102, Glucose-oxidase
pl: E1102, Oksydaza glukozowa
pt: E1102, Glicose oxidase, Glucose oxidase, Oxidase de glicose
ro: E1102, Glucozoxidază
sk: E1102, Glukóza oxidáza
sl: E1102, Glukoza oksidaza
sv: E1102, Glukosoxidase

en: E1103, Invertase
xx: E1103
ar: E1103, أنزيمة الانفرتاز
bg: E1103, Инвертаза
bs: E1103, Invertaza
ca: E1103, Invertasa
cs: E1103, Invertasa, Invertáza, Beta-fruktofuranosidasa, Beta-fruktofuranosidáza, E 1103
da: E1103, Invertase
de: E1103, Invertase, Saccharase, Invertin, E 1103
el: E1103, Ιμβερταση
es: E1103, Invertasa
et: E1103, Invertaas
fi: E1103, Invertaasi, Invertaasia
fr: E1103, Invertase
ga: E1103, inbhéartáis
he: E1103, אינוורטאז
hr: E1103, invertaza
hu: E1103, Invertáz
io: E1103, Invertazo
it: E1103, Invertasi
ja: E1103, サッカラーゼ
lt: E1103, Invertazė
lv: E1103, Invertāze
mt: E1103, Invertażi
nl: E1103, Invertase
nn: E1103, invertase
pl: E1103, Inwertaza, Fruktozydaza, Sacharaza
pt: E1103, Invertase, Beta-frutofuranosidase
ro: E1103, Invertază
ru: E1103, Инвертаза
sk: E1103, Inertáza
sl: E1103, Invertaza
sv: E1103, Invertas
uk: E1103, Інвертаза
zh: E1103, 蔗糖酶

en: E1104, lipase
xx: E1104
ar: E1104, ليباز
bg: E1104
bs: E1104, Lipaza
ca: E1104, lipasa
cs: E1104, Lipáza, Lipasa
da: E1104, Lipase
de: E1104, Lipasen, Lipase
el: E1104, λιπάση
eo: E1104, lipazo
es: E1104, Lipasa
et: E1104, E1104
eu: E1104, Lipasa
fa: E1104, لیپاز
fi: E1104, Lipaasi, Lipaasia
fr: E1104, Lipases, Lipase
ga: E1104, Liopáis
gl: E1104, Lipase
he: E1104, ליפאז
hi: E1104, लाइपेज
hu: E1104, Lipáz
id: E1104, Lipase
it: E1104, Lipasi
ja: E1104, リパーゼ
kk: E1104, Липазалар
ko: E1104, 라이페이스
ky: E1104, Липазалар
lt: E1104
lv: E1104
ms: E1104, Lipase
mt: E1104
nb: E1104, lipase
nl: E1104, Lipase
nn: E1104, lipase
pa: E1104, ਲਾਈਪੇਸ
pl: E1104, Lipazy, Lipaza, Enzymy lipolityczne
pt: E1104, Lipase, Lipases
ro: E1104, E1104
ru: E1104, Липаза
sh: E1104, Lipaza
sk: E1104, Lipaza
sl: E1104, Lipaza
sr: E1104, липаза
sv: E1104, Lipas, Lipaser
tr: E1104, Lipaz
uk: E1104, Ліпаза
uz: E1104, Lipaza
vi: E1104, Lipase
zh: E1104, 脂酶

en: E1105, Lysozyme, Lysozyme hydrochloride, E 1105, E-1105
xx: E1105
ar: E1105, ليزوزيم
bg: E1105, Лизоцим, Лизоцим хидрохлорид
ca: E1105, Lisozim
cs: E1105, Lysozym, Lysozym hydrochlorid, Lysosym, E 1105, Lyzozym
da: E1105, Lysozym, Lysozymhydrochlorid
de: E1105, Lysozym, Lysozymhydrochlorid, Muramidase, E 1105
el: E1105, Λυσοζυμη, Υδροχλωρική λυσοζύμη
es: E1105, Lisozima, Clorhidrato de lisozima, Muramidasa, E 1105
et: E1105, Lüsosüüm, Lüsosüümhüdrokloriid
eu: E1105, Lisozima
fa: E1105, لیزوزیم
fi: E1105, Lysotsyymi, Lysotsyymihydrokloridi, Lysosyymi, Lysotsyymiä, Lysotsyymihydrokloridia, Lysosyymiä
fr: E1105, Lysozyme, Hydrochlorure de lysozyme, Lysosyme, Muramidase, E 1105
ga: E1105, Lísisím
gl: E1105, Lisocima
he: E1105, ליזוזים
hr: E1105, Lizozim
hu: E1105, Lizozim, Lizozim-hidroklorid
hy: E1105, Լիզոցիմ
id: E1105, Lisozim
it: E1105, Lisozima, Lisozima cloridrato, Lysozyme, Muramidasi
ja: E1105, リゾチーム
jv: E1105, Lisozim
kk: E1105, Лизоцим
lt: E1105, Lizocimas, Lizocimo hidrochloridas
lv: E1105, Lizocīms, Lizocīma hidrohlorīds
mk: E1105, Лизозим
ms: E1105, Lisozim
mt: E1105, Lisożima, Idroklorur tal-lisożima
nb: E1105, Lysozym
nl: E1105, Lysozym, Lysozymhydrochloride, Lysozyme, Muramidase
oc: E1105, Lisozim
pa: E1105, ਲਾਈਜ਼ੋਜਾਈਮ
pl: E1105, Lizozym, Chlorowodorek lizozymu, Muramidaza
pt: E1105, Lisozima, Cloridrato de lisozima
ro: E1105, Lizozim, Lizozim clorhidrat
ru: E1105, Лизоцим, Муромидаза, Мурамидаза, Е1105, Лизоцин
sh: E1105, Lizozim
sk: E1105, Lyzozým, Lyzozým hydrochlorid
sl: E1105, Lizocim, lizocim hidroklorid, Muramidaza
sr: E1105, лизозим
sv: E1105, Lysozym, Lysozymhydroklorid, E 1105
ta: E1105, லைசோசைம்
tr: E1105, Lizozim
uk: E1105, Лізоцим
zh: E1105, 溶菌酶

en: E1200, Polydextrose, 68424-04-4
xx: E1200
bg: E1200, Полидекстроза
ca: E1200, Polidextrosa
cs: E1200, Polydextrosa
da: E1200, Polydextrose, polydekstrose
de: E1200, Polydextrose
el: E1200, Πολυδεξτροζη
es: E1200, Polidextrosa
et: E1200, Polüdekstroos
fi: E1200, Polydekstroosi, Polydekstroosia
fr: E1200, Polydextrose
hr: E1200, polidekstroza
hu: E1200, Polidextróz
it: E1200, Polidestrosio
lt: E1200, Polidekstrozė
lv: E1200, Polidekstroze
mt: E1200, Polidestrożju
nb: E1200, Polydextrose
nl: E1200, Polydextrose
pl: E1200, Polidekstroza
pt: E1200, Polidextrose
ro: E1200, Polidextroză
sk: E1200, Polydextróza
sl: E1200, Polidekstroza
sv: E1200, Polydextros
tr: E1200, Polidekstroz

en: E1201, Polyvinylpyrrolidone, Povidone, PVP
xx: E1201
bg: E1201, Поливинилпиролидон, Повидон, PVP
ca: E1201, Polivinilpirrolidona
cs: E1201, Polyvinylpyrolidon, Povidon, PVP, Polyvinylpyrrolidon
da: E1201, Polyvinylpyrrolidon, Povidon, PVP
de: E1201, Polyvinylpyrrolidon, Povidon, PVP, Povidone, Polyvidon
el: E1201, Πολυβινυλοπυρρολιδονη, Ποβιδόνη, PVΡ
es: E1201, Polivinilpirrolidona, Povidono, PVP, Povidona
et: E1201, Polüvinüülpürrolidoon, Povidoon
fi: E1201, Polyvinyylipyrrolidoni, Povidoni, PVP, Polyvinyylipyrrolidonia, Povidonia
fr: E1201, Poly vinyl pyrrolidone, Polyvinylpyrrolidone, Povidone, PVP, polyvidone
hu: E1201, Poli(vinil-pirrolidon), Polivinilpirrolidon, Povidon, PVP
it: E1201, Polivinilpirrolidone, Povidone, PVP
lt: E1201, Polivinilpirolidonas, Povidonas, PVP
lv: E1201, Polivinilpirolidons, Povidons, PVP
mt: E1201, Polivinilpirrolidon, Povidon, PVP
nl: E1201, Polyvinylpyrrolidon, Povidon, PVP, Povidone, Polyvidone, Polyvidon
pl: E1201, Poliwinylopirolidon, Powidon, PVP, Poliwidon
pt: E1201, Polivinilpirrolidona, Povidona, PVP
ro: E1201, Polivinilpirolidonă, Povidonă, PVP
sk: E1201, Polyvinylpyrolidón, Povidon, PVP
sl: E1201, Polivinilpirolidon, povidon, PVP
sv: E1201, Polyvinylpyrrolidon, Povidon, PVP

en: E1202, Polyvinylpolypyrrolidone, Crospovidone, Cross-linked polyvidone
xx: E1202
bg: E1202, Поливинилполипиролидон, Кросповидон, поливидон с напречни връзки
ca: E1202, Polivinilpolipirrolidona
cs: E1202, Polyvinylpolypyrolidon, Krospovidon, zesítěný povidon
da: E1202, Polyvinylpolypyrrolidon, Crospovidon, tværbundet polyvidon
de: E1202, Polyvinylpolypyrrolidon, Crospovidon, vernetztes Polyvidon
el: E1202, Πολυβινυλοπολυπυρρολιδονη, Κροσποβιδόνη, πολυβιδόνη με σταυροδεσμούς
es: E1202, Polivinilpolipirrolidona, Crospovidona, polividona reticular
et: E1202, Polüvinüülpolüpürrolidoon, Krospovidoon, ristseotud polüvidoon
fi: E1202, Polyvinyylipolypyrrolidoni, Krospovidoni, silloitettu polyvidoni, Polyvinyylipolypyrrolidonia, Krospovidonia, silloitettua polyvidonia
fr: E1202, , Polyvinylpolypyrrolidone, Crospovidone, polyvidone réticulée, PVPP
hu: E1202, Poli(vinil-polipirrolidon), Polivinilpolipirrolidon, Kroszpovidon, Térhálós polividon
it: E1202, Polivinilpolipirrolidone, Crospovidone, polividone reticolato
lt: E1202, Polivinilpolipirolidonas, Krospovidonas, skersinio ryšio polividonas
lv: E1202, Polivinilpolipirolidons, Krospovidons, šķērsšūtais polividons
mt: E1202, Polivinilpolipirrolidon, Krospovidon, Polividon inkroċjat
nl: E1202, Polyvinylpolypyrrolidon, Crospovidon, vernet polyvidon
pl: E1202, Poliwinylopolipirolidon, Krospowidon, poliwidon usieciowany
pt: E1202, Polivinilpolipirrolidona, Crospovidona, polividona reticulada
ro: E1202, Polivinilpolipirolidonă
sk: E1202, Polyvinylpolypyrolidón, Krospovidón, zosieťovaný polyvidón
sl: E1202, Polivinilpolipirolidon, krospovidon, zamrežen polividon
sv: E1202, Polyvinylpolypyrrolidon, Krospovidon, tvärbunden polyvidon

en: E1203, Polyvinyl alcohol, Vinyl alcohol polymer, PVOH, PVAl
xx: E1203
bg: E1203, Поливинил алкохол, Полимер на винил алкохол, Поливинилов алкохол
cs: E1203, Polyvinylalkohol (pva), Polymer vinylalkoholu, Polyvinylalkohol
da: E1203, Polyvinylalkohol, Vinylalkoholpolymer
de: E1203, Polyvinylalkohol
el: E1203, Πολυβινυλικη αλκοολη, Πολυμερές βινυλικής αλκοόλης
es: E1203, Alcohol polivinílico, Polímero de alcohol vinílico
et: E1203, Polüvinüülalkohol
fi: E1203, Polyvinyylialkoholi, Vinyylialkoholipolymeeri, Polyvinyylialkoholia, Vinyylialkoholipolymeeriä
fr: E1203, Alcool polyvinylique, Polymère d'alcool vinylique
hu: E1203, Poli(vinil-alkohol), Vinil-alkohol-polimer
it: E1203, Alcol polivinilico, Polimero di alcol vinilico, Alcool polivinilico
lt: E1203, Polivinilo alkoholis, Vinilo alkoholio polimeras
lv: E1203, Polivinilspirts, Vinilspirta polimērs
mt: E1203, Alkoħol poliviniliku, Polimer tal-alkoħol viniliku
nl: E1203, Polyvinylalcohol, Vinylalcohol-polymeer
pl: E1203, Alkohol poliwinylowy, Polimer alkoholu winylowego, Poli
pt: E1203, Poli(álcool vinílico) (pva), Polímero de álcool vinílico, Álcool polivinílico
ro: E1203, Alcool polivinilic, Polimer de alcool vinilic
sk: E1203, Polyvinylalkohol, Polymér vinylalkoholu
sl: E1203, Polivinil alkohol, polimer vinil alkohola
sv: E1203, Polyvinylalkohol, Vinylalkoholpolymer, PVOH

en: E1204, Pullulan, Linear
xx: E1204
bg: E1204, Пулулан
ca: E1204, Pullulan
cs: E1204, Pullulan, Lineární
da: E1204, Pullulan, Lineær, neutral glucan
de: E1204, Pullulan, E 1204
el: E1204, Πουλουλανη, Γραμμική
es: E1204, Pululano
et: E1204, Pullulaan
fi: E1204, Pullulaani, Lineaarinen, neutraali glukaani, Pullulaania, neutraalia glukaania
fr: E1204, Pullulane, Pullulan, 9057-02-7, (C37H62O30)n
hu: E1204, Pullulán
it: E1204, Pullulano, Glucano lineare
lt: E1204, Pululanas
lv: E1204, Pullulāns
mt: E1204, Pullulan, Glukan lineari
nl: E1204, Pullulan, Onvertakt, neutraal glucan
pl: E1204, Pullulan, Liniowy
pt: E1204, Pululana, Glucano linear, neutro
ro: E1204, Pululan, Glucan linear, neutru
sk: E1204, Pululán, Lineárny
sl: E1204, Pululan
sv: E1204, Pullulan, Rak

en: E1205, Basic methacrylate copolymer
xx: E1205
bg: E1205, Основен метакрилат кополимер
ca: E1205, Copolímer de metacrilat bàsic
cs: E1205, Bazický kopolymer methakrylátu
da: E1205, Basisk methacrylat-copolymer
de: E1205, Basisches methacrylat-copolymer
el: E1205, Βασικο μεθακρυλικο συμπολυμερες
es: E1205, Copolímero de metacrilato básico
et: E1205, Aluseline metakrülaatkopolümeer
fi: E1205, Emäksinen metakrylaattikopolymeeri, Emäksistä metakrylaattikopolymeeriä
fr: E1205, Copolymère méthacrylate basique
hu: E1205, Bázikus metakrilát-kopolimer
it: E1205, Copolimero di metacrilato basico
lt: E1205, Bazinis metakrilato kopolimeras
lv: E1205, Metakrilāta bāzes kopolimērs
mt: E1205, Kopolimeru metakrilat bażiku
nl: E1205, Basisch methacrylaatcopolymeer
pl: E1205, Zasadowy kopolimer metakrylanu
pt: E1205, Copolímero de metacrilato básico
ro: E1205, Copolimer metacrilat bazic
sk: E1205, Kopolymér základného metakrylátu
sl: E1205, Osnovni kopolimer metakrilata
sv: E1205, Basisk metakrylatsampolymer

en: E1206, Neutral methacrylate copolymer
xx: E1206
fr: Copolymère de méthacrylate neutre

en: E1207, Anionic methacrylate copolymer
xx: E1207
fr: Copolymère de méthacrylate anionique

en: E1208, Polyvinylpyrrolidone-vinyl acetate copolymer
xx: E1208
fr: Copolymère d’acétate de vinyle et de polyvinylpyrrolidone

en: E1209, Polyvinyl alcohol-polyethylene glycol-graft-co-polymer
xx: E1209
fr: Copolymère greffé d'alcool polyvinylique et de polyéthylèneglycol

en: E1210, Carbomer
xx: E1210
ar: E1210, كاربومير
az: E1210, Karbomer
bg: E1210, Карбомер
ca: E1210, Carbòmer
cs: E1210, Karbomer
da: E1210, Carbomer
de: E1210, Carbomer
el: E1210, Καρβομερές
eo: E1210, Karbomero
es: E1210, Carbómero
et: E1210, Karbomeer
fa: E1210, کربومر
fi: E1210, Karbomeeri
fr: E1210, Carbomère
he: E1210, קרבומר
hi: E1210, कार्बोमर
hr: E1210, Karbomer
hu: E1210, Karbomer
id: E1210, Karbomer
it: E1210, Carbomer
ja: E1210, カルボマー
ko: E1210, 카보머
lt: E1210, Karbomeras
lv: E1210, Karbomērs
mk: E1210, Карбомер
ms: E1210, Karbomer
mt: E1210, Karbomer
nl: E1210, Carbomeer
no: E1210, Karbomer
pl: E1210, Karbomer
pt: E1210, Carbómero
ro: E1210, Carbomer
ru: E1210, Карбомер
sk: E1210, Karbomér
sl: E1210, Karbomer
sq: E1210, Karbomer
sr: E1210, Карбомер
sv: E1210, Karbomer
th: E1210, คาร์โบเมอร์
tr: E1210, Karbomer
uk: E1210, Карбомер
vi: E1210, Carbomer
zh: E1210, 卡波姆